Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8335.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Legislative findings.
The general assembly finds that independent primary care practices face unsustainable
overhead increases and reimbursement compression, resulting in closures and patient displacement.
Commercial primary care rates in Rhode Island lag approximately twenty-nine percent (29%)
behind neighboring states. State-directed payments under 42 C.F.R. § 438.6(c) provide a no-net-
cost mechanism to stabilize these practices using existing Medicaid funds and federal matching
dollars. Enhanced rates, supplements, and commercial parity are essential to prevent further
closures and reduce system-wide costs.
SECTION 2. Title 27 of the General Laws entitled "INSURANCE" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 18.10
MEDICAID AND COMMERCIAL PRIMARY CARE RATE ENHANCEMENT AND
SUSTAINABILITY ACT
27-18.10-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Medicaid and Commercial Primary
Care Rate Enhancement and Sustainability Act”
27-18.10-2. Patient-centered medical home expansion and enhanced per-member-
per-month supplements.

(a) The executive office of health and human services (EOHHS) shall expand the patient-
centered medical home (PCMH) program to all Medicaid-accepting independent primary care
practices and nurse practitioners.
(b) Through state-directed payments under 42 C.F.R. § 438.6(c), EOHHS shall require
managed care organizations (MCOs) to pay an enhanced per-member-per-month (PMPM)
supplement of ten dollars ($10.00) to twenty dollars ($20.00) for each attributed Medicaid patient
to eligible independent providers who enroll in PCMH or meet equivalent criteria.
27-18.10-3. Rate acceleration; Automatic per-member-per-month access payments
and bonus.
(a) EOHHS shall accelerate the FY2026 primary care rate increase to one hundred percent
(100%) of Medicare and add a temporary twenty-five percent (25%) bonus for independent (non-
hospital-employed) practices.
(b) Through state-directed payments under 42 C.F.R. § 438.6(c), EOHHS shall require
MCOs to pay an automatic access payment supplement of eight dollars ($8.00) to fifteen dollars
($15.00) PMPM for every attributed Medicaid patient in qualifying independent practices.
27-18.10-4. Commercial rate parity.
The office of the health insurance commissioner shall require commercial insurers and
Medicare Advantage plans to align primary care reimbursement rates with those in Massachusetts
and Connecticut (approximately twenty-nine percent (29%) higher on average) through phased
implementation: fifteen percent (15%) by January 1, 2027 and full alignment by July 1, 2027.
27-18.10-5. Eligibility and implementation.
(a) Eligibility is limited to independent primary care physicians and nurse practitioners
who accept Medicaid and meet minimal quality and reporting requirements established by EOHHS.
(b) On and after January 1, 2027, EOHHS shall:
(1) Submit the necessary state-directed payment preprints to the centers for Medicare &
Medicaid services;
(2) Update all MCO contracts to incorporate these payments;
(3) Build on the existing multi-payer PCMH program administered by the office of the
health insurance commissioner (OHIC) in consultation with the Care Transformation Collaborative
of Rhode Island (CTC-RI); and
(4) Issue annual reports on access, retention, and cost savings.
(c) The office of the health insurance commissioner shall amend regulations and insurer
contracts to enforce commercial parity.
27-18.10-6. Enforcement.
LC006082 - Page 2 of 4

The office of the health insurance commissioner and EOHHS shall enforce this chapter
under existing authority. Non-compliant contract provisions are void.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
========
LC006082
========
LC006082 - Page 3 of 4